Rhode Island, session 2025, HB6047.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 27-18-57 of the General Laws in Chapter 27-18 entitled "Accident
and Sickness Insurance Policies" is hereby amended to read as follows:
27-18-57. F.D.A. approved prescription contraceptive drugs and devices.
(a) Every individual or group health insurance contract, plan, or policy issued pursuant to
this title that provides prescription coverage and is delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed,
amended, or effective in this state on or after January 1, 2026, shall provide coverage for F.D.A.
approved contraceptive drugs and devices requiring a prescription all of the following services and
contraceptive methods. Provided, that nothing in this subsection shall be deemed to mandate or
require coverage for the prescription drug RU 486.
(1) All FDA-approved contraceptive drugs, devices, and other products. The following
applies to this coverage:
(i) If there is a therapeutic equivalent of an FDA-approved contraceptive drug, device, or
product, the contract shall include either the original FDA-approved contraceptive drug, device, or
product or at least one of its therapeutic equivalents. "Therapeutic equivalent" shall have the same
definition as that set forth by the FDA;
(ii) If the covered therapeutic equivalent versions of a drug, device, or product are not
available, or are not tolerated by the patient, or are deemed medically inadvisable, a group or
blanket policy shall provide coverage for an alternate therapeutic equivalent version of the
contraceptive drug, device, or product, based on the determination of the healthcare provider,

without cost-sharing; and
(iii) A plan shall not require a prescription to trigger coverage of FDA-approved over-the-
counter contraceptive drugs, devices, and products, and shall provide point-of-sale coverage for
over-the-counter contraceptives at in-network pharmacies without cost-sharing or medical
management restrictions;
(2) Voluntary sterilization procedures;
(3) Clinical services related to the provision or use of contraception, including
consultations, examinations, procedures, device insertion, ultrasound, anesthesia, patient
education, referrals, and counseling; and
(4) Follow-up services related to the drugs, devices, products, and procedures covered
under this section, including, but not limited to, management of side effects, counseling for
continued adherence, and device insertion and removal.
(b) A group or blanket policy subject to this section shall not impose a deductible,
coinsurance, copayment or any other cost-sharing requirement on the coverage provided pursuant
to this section. For a qualifying high-deductible health plan for a health savings account, the carrier
shall establish the plan's cost-sharing for the coverage provided pursuant to this section at the
minimum level necessary to preserve the enrollee's ability to claim tax-exempt contributions and
withdrawals from their health savings account under 26 U.S.C. § 223. A health plan shall not
impose utilization control or other forms of medical management limiting the supply of FDA-
approved contraception that may be dispensed or furnished by a provider or pharmacist, or at a
location licensed or otherwise authorized to dispense drugs or supplies in an amount that is less
than a twelve (12) month supply, and shall not require an enrollee to make any formal request for
such coverage other than a pharmacy claim.
(c) Except as otherwise authorized under this section, a group or blanket policy shall not
impose any restrictions or delays on the coverage required under this section.
(d) Benefits for an enrollee under this section shall be the same for an enrollee's covered
spouse or domestic partner and covered non-spouse dependents
(b)(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, any insurance company may
issue to a religious employer an individual or group health insurance contract, plan, or policy that
excludes coverage for prescription contraceptive methods that are contrary to the religious
employer’s bona fide religious tenets. The exclusion from coverage under this subsection shall not
apply to contraceptive services or procedures provided for purposes other than contraception, such
as decreasing the risk of ovarian cancer or eliminating symptoms of menopause.
(c)(f) As used in this section, “religious employer” means an employer that is a “church or
LC002275 - Page 2 of 15

a qualified church-controlled organization” as defined in 26 U.S.C. § 3121.
(d)(g) This section does not apply to insurance coverage providing benefits for: (1) Hospital
confinement indemnity; (2) Disability income; (3) Accident only; (4) Long-term care; (5) Medicare
supplement; (6) Limited benefit health; (7) Specified disease indemnity; (8) Sickness or bodily
injury or death by accident or both; and (9) Other limited-benefit policies.
(e)(h) Every religious employer that invokes the exemption provided under this section
shall provide written notice to prospective enrollees prior to enrollment with the plan, listing the
contraceptive healthcare services the employer refuses to cover for religious reasons.
(f)(i) Beginning on the first day of each plan year after April 1, 2019, every health insurance
issuer offering group or individual health insurance coverage that covers prescription contraception
shall not restrict reimbursement for dispensing a covered prescription contraceptive up to three
hundred sixty-five (365) days at a time that may be furnished or dispensed all at once or over the
course of the twelve (12) month period at the discretion of the prescriber.
(j) Nothing in this section shall be construed to exclude coverage for contraceptive drugs,
devices, or products for reasons other than contraceptive purposes, such as decreasing the risk of
ovarian cancer or eliminating symptoms of menopause, or for contraception that is necessary to
preserve the life or health of an enrollee. A plan that violates this section is subject to penalties, in
accordance with § 27-18-20. The department may base its determinations on findings from onsite
surveys, enrollee or other complaints, financial status, or any other source.
(k) The department shall monitor plan compliance in accordance with this section and shall
adopt rules and regulations for the implementation of this section, including the following:
(1) In addition to any requirements under state administrative procedures, the department
shall engage in a stakeholder process prior to the adoption of rules and regulations that include
healthcare service plans, pharmacy benefit plans, consumer representatives, including those
representing youth, low-income people, and communities of color, and other interested parties. The
department shall hold stakeholder meetings for stakeholders of different types to ensure sufficient
opportunity to consider factors and processes relevant to contraceptive coverage. The department
shall provide notice of stakeholder meetings on the department's website, and stakeholder meetings
shall be open to the public.
(2) The department shall conduct random reviews of each plan and its subcontractors to
ensure compliance with this section.
(3) The department shall submit an annual report to the general assembly and any other
appropriate entity with its findings from the random compliance reviews detailed in this section
and any other compliance or implementation efforts. This report shall be made available to the
LC002275 - Page 3 of 15

public on the department’s website.
SECTION 2. Section 27-19-48 of the General Laws in Chapter 27-19 entitled "Nonprofit
Hospital Service Corporations" is hereby amended to read as follows:
27-19-48. FDA approved prescription contraceptive drugs and devices.
(a) Every individual or group health insurance contract, plan, or policy issued pursuant to
this title that provides prescription coverage and is delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed,
amended, or effective in this state on or after January 1, 2026, shall provide coverage for F.D.A.
approved contraceptive drugs and devices requiring a prescription all of the following services and
contraceptive methods. Provided, that nothing in this subsection shall be deemed to mandate or
require coverage for the prescription drug RU 486.
(1) All FDA-approved contraceptive drugs, devices, and other products. The following
applies to this coverage:
(i) If there is a therapeutic equivalent of an FDA-approved contraceptive drug, device, or
product, the contract shall include either the original FDA-approved contraceptive drug, device, or
product or at least one of its therapeutic equivalents. "Therapeutic equivalent" shall have the same
definition as that set forth by the FDA;
(ii) If the covered therapeutic equivalent versions of a drug, device, or product are not
available, or are not tolerated by the patient, or are deemed medically inadvisable, a group or
blanket policy shall provide coverage for an alternate therapeutic equivalent version of the
contraceptive drug, device, or product, based on the determination of the healthcare provider,
without cost-sharing; and
(iii) A plan shall not require a prescription to trigger coverage of FDA-approved over-the-
counter contraceptive drugs, devices, and products, and shall provide point-of-sale coverage for
over-the-counter contraceptives at in-network pharmacies without cost-sharing or medical
management restrictions;
(2) Voluntary sterilization procedures;
(3) Clinical services related to the provision or use of contraception, including
consultations, examinations, procedures, device insertion, ultrasound, anesthesia, patient
education, referrals, and counseling; and
(4) Follow-up services related to the drugs, devices, products, and procedures covered
under this section, including, but not limited to, management of side effects, counseling for
continued adherence, and device insertion and removal.
(b) A group or blanket policy subject to this section shall not impose a deductible,
coinsurance, copayment or any other cost-sharing requirement on the coverage provided pursuant
LC002275 - Page 4 of 15

to this section. For a qualifying high-deductible health plan for a health savings account, the carrier
shall establish the plan's cost-sharing for the coverage provided pursuant to this section at the
minimum level necessary to preserve the enrollee's ability to claim tax-exempt contributions and
withdrawals from their health savings account under 26 U.S.C. § 223. A health plan shall not
impose utilization control or other forms of medical management limiting the supply of FDA-
approved contraception that may be dispensed or furnished by a provider or pharmacist, or at a
location licensed or otherwise authorized to dispense drugs or supplies in an amount that is less
than a twelve (12) month supply, and shall not require an enrollee to make any formal request for
such coverage other than a pharmacy claim.
(c) Except as otherwise authorized under this section, a group or blanket policy shall not
impose any restrictions or delays on the coverage required under this section.
(d) Benefits for an enrollee under this section shall be the same for an enrollee's covered
spouse or domestic partner and covered non-spouse dependents.
(b)(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, any hospital service corporation
may issue to a religious employer an individual or group health insurance contract, plan, or policy
that excludes coverage for prescription contraceptive methods that are contrary to the religious
employer’s bona fide religious tenets. The exclusion from coverage under this subsection shall not
apply to contraceptive services or procedures provided for purposes other than contraception, such
as decreasing the risk of ovarian cancer or eliminating symptoms of menopause.
(c)(f) As used in this section, “religious employer” means an employer that is a “church or
a qualified church-controlled organization” as defined in 26 U.S.C. § 3121.
(d)(g) Every religious employer that invokes the exemption provided under this section
shall provide written notice to prospective enrollees prior to enrollment with the plan, listing the
contraceptive healthcare services the employer refuses to cover for religious reasons.
(e)(h) Beginning on the first day of each plan year after April 1, 2019, every health
insurance issuer offering group or individual health insurance coverage that covers prescription
contraception shall not restrict reimbursement for dispensing a covered prescription contraceptive
up to three hundred sixty-five (365) days at a time that may be furnished or dispensed all at once
or over the course of the twelve (12) month period at the discretion of the prescriber.
(i) Nothing in this section shall be construed to exclude coverage for contraceptive drugs,
devices, or products for reasons other than contraceptive purposes, such as decreasing the risk of
ovarian cancer or eliminating symptoms of menopause, or for contraception that is necessary to
preserve the life or health of an enrollee. A plan that violates this section is subject to penalties, in
accordance with § 27-19-38. The department may base its determinations on findings from onsite
LC002275 - Page 5 of 15

surveys, enrollee or other complaints, financial status, or any other source.
(j) The department shall monitor plan compliance in accordance with this section and shall
adopt rules and regulations for the implementation of this section, including the following:
(1) In addition to any requirements under state administrative procedures, the department
shall engage in a stakeholder process prior to the adoption of rules and regulations that include
healthcare service plans, pharmacy benefit plans, consumer representatives, including those
representing youth, low-income people, and communities of color, and other interested parties. The
department shall hold stakeholder meetings for stakeholders of different types to ensure sufficient
opportunity to consider factors and processes relevant to contraceptive coverage. The department
shall provide notice of stakeholder meetings on the department's website, and stakeholder meetings
shall be open to the public.
(2) The department shall conduct random reviews of each plan and its subcontractors to
ensure compliance with this section.
(3) The department shall submit an annual report to the general assembly and any other
appropriate entity with its findings from the random compliance reviews detailed in this section
and any other compliance or implementation efforts. This report shall be made available to the
public on the department’s website.
SECTION 3. Section 27-20-43 of the General Laws in Chapter 27-20 entitled "Nonprofit
Medical Service Corporations" is hereby amended to read as follows:
27-20-43. FDA approved prescription contraceptive drugs and devices.
(a) Every individual or group health insurance contract, plan, or policy issued pursuant to
this title that provides prescription coverage and is delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed,
amended, or effective in this state on or after January 1, 2026, shall provide coverage for F.D.A.
approved contraceptive drugs and devices requiring a prescription all of the following services and
contraceptive methods. Provided, that nothing in this subsection shall be deemed to mandate or
require coverage for the prescription drug RU 486.
(1) All FDA-approved contraceptive drugs, devices and other products. The following
applies to this coverage:
(i) If there is a therapeutic equivalent of an FDA-approved contraceptive drug, device, or
product, the contract shall include either the original FDA-approved contraceptive drug, device, or
product or at least one of its therapeutic equivalents. "Therapeutic equivalent" shall have the same
definition as that set forth by the FDA; If the covered therapeutic equivalent versions of a drug,
device, or product are not available, or are not tolerated by the patient, or are deemed medically
inadvisable, a group or blanket policy shall provide coverage for an alternate therapeutic equivalent
LC002275 - Page 6 of 15

version of the contraceptive drug, device, or product, based on the determination of the healthcare
provider, without cost-sharing; and
(ii) A plan shall not require a prescription to trigger coverage of FDA-approved over-the-
counter contraceptive drugs, devices, and products, and shall provide point-of-sale coverage for
over-the-counter contraceptives at in-network pharmacies without cost-sharing or medical
management restrictions;
(2) Voluntary sterilization procedures;
(3) Clinical services related to the provision or use of contraception, including
consultations, examinations, procedures, device insertion, ultrasound, anesthesia, patient
education, referrals, and counseling; and
(4) Follow-up services related to the drugs, devices, products, and procedures covered
under this section, including, but not limited to, management of side effects, counseling for
continued adherence, and device insertion and removal.
(b) A group or blanket policy subject to this section shall not impose a deductible,
coinsurance, copayment or any other cost-sharing requirement on the coverage provided pursuant
to this section. For a qualifying high-deductible health plan for a health savings account, the carrier
shall establish the plan's cost-sharing for the coverage provided pursuant to this section at the
minimum level necessary to preserve the enrollee's ability to claim tax-exempt contributions and
withdrawals from their health savings account under 26 U.S.C. § 223. A health plan shall not
impose utilization control or other forms of medical management limiting the supply of FDA-
approved contraception that may be dispensed or furnished by a provider or pharmacist, or at a
location licensed or otherwise authorized to dispense drugs or supplies in an amount that is less
than a twelve (12) month supply, and shall not require an enrollee to make any formal request for
such coverage other than a pharmacy claim.
(c) Except as otherwise authorized under this section, a group or blanket policy shall not
impose any restrictions or delays on the coverage required under this section.
(d) Benefits for an enrollee under this section shall be the same for an enrollee's covered
spouse or domestic partner and covered non-spouse dependents.
(b)(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, any medical service corporation
may issue to a religious employer an individual or group health insurance contract, plan, or policy
that excludes coverage for prescription contraceptive methods that are contrary to the religious
employer’s bona fide religious tenets. The exclusion from coverage under this subsection, shall not
apply to contraceptive services or procedures provided for purposes other than contraception, such
as decreasing the risk of ovarian cancer or eliminating symptoms of menopause.
LC002275 - Page 7 of 15

(c)(f) As used in this section, “religious employer” means an employer that is a “church or
a qualified church-controlled organization” as defined in 26 U.S.C. § 3121.
(d)(g) Every religious employer that invokes the exemption provided under this section
shall provide written notice to prospective enrollees prior to enrollment with the plan, listing the
contraceptive healthcare services the employer refuses to cover for religious reasons.
(e)(h) Beginning on the first day of each plan year after April 1, 2019, every health
insurance issuer offering group or individual health insurance coverage that covers prescription
contraception shall not restrict reimbursement for dispensing a covered prescription contraceptive
up to three hundred sixty-five (365) days at a time that may be furnished or dispensed all at once
or over the course of the twelve (12) month period at the discretion of the prescriber.
(i) Nothing in this section shall be construed to exclude coverage for contraceptive drugs,
devices, or products for reasons other than contraceptive purposes, such as decreasing the risk of
ovarian cancer or eliminating symptoms of menopause, or for contraception that is necessary to
preserve the life or health of an enrollee. A plan that violates this section is subject to penalties, in
accordance with § 27-20-33. The department may base its determinations on findings from onsite
surveys, enrollee or other complaints, financial status, or any other source.
(j) The department shall monitor plan compliance in accordance with this section and shall
adopt rules and regulations for the implementation of this section, including the following:
(1) In addition to any requirements under state administrative procedures, the department
shall engage in a stakeholder process prior to the adoption of rules and regulations that include
healthcare service plans, pharmacy benefit plans, consumer representatives, including those
representing youth, low-income people, and communities of color, and other interested parties. The
department shall hold stakeholder meetings for stakeholders of different types to ensure sufficient
opportunity to consider factors and processes relevant to contraceptive coverage. The department
shall provide notice of stakeholder meetings on the department's website, and stakeholder meetings
shall be open to the public.
(2) The department shall conduct random reviews of each plan and its subcontractors to
ensure compliance with this section.
(3) The department shall submit an annual report to the general assembly and any other
appropriate entity with its findings from the random compliance reviews detailed in this section
and any other compliance or implementation efforts. This report shall be made available to the
public on the department’s website.
SECTION 4. Section 27-41-59 of the General Laws in Chapter 27-41 entitled "Health
Maintenance Organizations" is hereby amended to read as follows:
LC002275 - Page 8 of 15

27-41-59. FDA approved prescription contraceptive drugs and devices.
(a) Every individual or group health insurance contract, plan, or policy issued pursuant to
this title that provides prescription coverage and is delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed,
amended, or effective in this state on or after January 1, 2026, shall provide coverage for FDA
approved contraceptive drugs and devices requiring a prescription; provided, all of the following
services and contraceptive methods. Provided all of the following services and contraceptive
methods. that nothing in this subsection shall be deemed to mandate or require coverage for the
prescription drug RU 486.
(1) All FDA-approved contraceptive drugs, devices, and other products. The following
applies to this coverage:
(i) If there is a therapeutic equivalent of an FDA-approved contraceptive drug, device, or
product, the contract shall include either the original FDA-approved contraceptive drug, device, or
product or at least one of its therapeutic equivalents. "Therapeutic equivalent" shall have the same
definition as that set forth by the FDA;
(ii) If the covered therapeutic equivalent versions of a drug, device, or product are not
available, or are not tolerated by the patient, or are deemed medically inadvisable, a group or
blanket policy shall provide coverage for an alternate therapeutic equivalent version of the
contraceptive drug, device, or product, based on the determination of the healthcare provider,
without cost-sharing; and
(iii) A plan shall not require a prescription to trigger coverage of FDA-approved over-the-
counter contraceptive drugs, devices, and products, and shall provide point-of-sale coverage for
over-the-counter contraceptives at in-network pharmacies without cost-sharing or medical
management restrictions;
(2) Voluntary sterilization procedures;
(3) Clinical services related to the provision or use of contraception, including
consultations, examinations, procedures, device insertion, ultrasound, anesthesia, patient
education, referrals, and counseling; and
(4) Follow-up services related to the drugs, devices, products, and procedures covered
under this section, including, but not limited to, management of side effects, counseling for
continued adherence, and device insertion and removal.
(b) A group or blanket policy subject to this section shall not impose a deductible,
coinsurance, copayment or any other cost-sharing requirement on the coverage provided pursuant
to this section. For a qualifying high-deductible health plan for a health savings account, the carrier
shall establish the plan's cost-sharing for the coverage provided pursuant to this section at the
LC002275 - Page 9 of 15

minimum level necessary to preserve the enrollee's ability to claim tax-exempt contributions and
withdrawals from their health savings account under 26 U.S.C. § 223. A health plan shall not
impose utilization control or other forms of medical management limiting the supply of FDA-
approved contraception that may be dispensed or furnished by a provider or pharmacist, or at a
location licensed or otherwise authorized to dispense drugs or supplies in an amount that is less
than a twelve (12) month supply, and shall not require an enrollee to make any formal request for
such coverage other than a pharmacy claim.
(c) Except as otherwise authorized under this section, a group or blanket policy shall not
impose any restrictions or delays on the coverage required under this section.
(d) Benefits for an enrollee under this section shall be the same for an enrollee's covered
spouse or domestic partner and covered non-spouse dependents.
(b)(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, any health maintenance
corporation may issue to a religious employer an individual or group health insurance contract,
plan, or policy that excludes coverage for prescription contraceptive methods that are contrary to
the religious employer’s bona fide religious tenets. The exclusion from coverage under this
subsection shall not apply to contraceptive services or procedures provided for purposes other than
contraception, such as decreasing the risk of ovarian cancer or eliminating symptoms of
menopause.
(c)(f) As used in this section, “religious employer” means an employer that is a “church or
a qualified church-controlled organization” as defined in 26 U.S.C. § 3121.
(d)(g) Every religious employer that invokes the exemption provided under this section
shall provide written notice to prospective enrollees prior to enrollment with the plan, listing the
contraceptive healthcare services the employer refuses to cover for religious reasons.
(e)(h) Beginning on the first day of each plan year after April 1, 2019, every health
insurance issuer offering group or individual health insurance coverage that covers prescription
contraception shall not restrict reimbursement for dispensing a covered prescription contraceptive
up to three hundred sixty-five (365) days at a time that may be furnished or dispensed all at once
or over the course of the twelve (12) month period at the discretion of the prescriber.
(i) Nothing in this section shall be construed to exclude coverage for contraceptive drugs,
devices, or products for reasons other than contraceptive purposes, such as decreasing the risk of
ovarian cancer or eliminating symptoms of menopause, or for contraception that is necessary to
preserve the life or health of an enrollee. A plan that violates this section is subject to penalties, in
accordance with § 27-41-21. The department may base its determinations on findings from onsite
surveys, enrollee or other complaints, financial status, or any other source.
LC002275 - Page 10 of 15

(j) The department shall monitor plan compliance in accordance with this section and shall
adopt rules and regulations for the implementation of this section, including the following:
(1) In addition to any requirements under state administrative procedures, the department
shall engage in a stakeholder process prior to the adoption of rules and regulations that include
healthcare service plans, pharmacy benefit plans, consumer representatives, including those
representing youth, low-income people, and communities of color, and other interested parties. The
department shall hold stakeholder meetings for stakeholders of different types to ensure sufficient
opportunity to consider factors and processes relevant to contraceptive coverage. The department
shall provide notice of stakeholder meetings on the department's website, and stakeholder meetings
shall be open to the public.
(2) The department shall conduct random reviews of each plan and its subcontractors to
ensure compliance with this section.
(3) The department shall submit an annual report to the general assembly and any other
appropriate entity with its findings from the random compliance reviews detailed in this section
and any other compliance or implementation efforts. This report shall be made available to the
public on the department’s website.
SECTION 5. Chapter 40-8 of the General Laws entitled "Medical Assistance" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
40-8-33. FDA-approved prescription contraceptive drugs and devices.
(a) Every individual or group health insurance contract, plan, or policy issued pursuant to
this chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery, renewed, amended or effective in this state on or
after January 1, 2026, shall provide coverage for all of the following services and contraceptive
methods. Provided, that nothing in this subsection shall be deemed to mandate or require coverage
for the prescription drug RU 486.
(1) All FDA-approved contraceptive drugs, devices, and other products. The following
applies to this coverage:
(i) If there is a therapeutic equivalent of an FDA-approved contraceptive drug, device, or
product, the contract shall include either the original FDA-approved contraceptive drug, device, or
product or at least one of its therapeutic equivalents. "Therapeutic equivalent" shall have the same
definition as that set forth by the FDA;
(ii) If the covered therapeutic equivalent versions of a drug, device, or product are not
available, or are not tolerated by the patient, or are deemed medically inadvisable, a group or
blanket policy shall provide coverage for an alternate therapeutic equivalent version of the
contraceptive drug, device, or product, based on the determination of the healthcare provider,
LC002275 - Page 11 of 15

without cost-sharing; and
(iii) A plan shall not require a prescription to trigger coverage of FDA-approved over-the-
counter contraceptive drugs, devices, and products, and shall provide point-of-sale coverage for
over-the-counter contraceptives at in-network pharmacies without cost-sharing or medical
management restrictions;
(2) Voluntary sterilization procedures;
(3) Clinical services related to the provision or use of contraception, including
consultations, examinations, procedures, device insertion, ultrasound, anesthesia, patient
education, referrals, and counseling; and
(4) Follow-up services related to the drugs, devices, products, and procedures covered
under this section, including, but not limited to, management of side effects, counseling for
continued adherence, and device insertion and removal.
(b) A group or blanket policy subject to this section shall not impose a deductible,
coinsurance, copayment or any other cost-sharing requirement on the coverage provided pursuant
to this section. For a qualifying high-deductible health plan for a health savings account, the carrier
shall establish the plan's cost-sharing for the coverage provided pursuant to this section at the
minimum level necessary to preserve the enrollee's ability to claim tax-exempt contributions and
withdrawals from their health savings account under 26 U.S.C. § 223. A health plan shall not
impose utilization control or other forms of medical management limiting the supply of FDA-
approved contraception that may be dispensed or furnished by a provider or pharmacist, or at a
location licensed or otherwise authorized to dispense drugs or supplies in an amount that is less
than a twelve (12) month supply, and shall not require an enrollee to make any formal request for
such coverage other than a pharmacy claim.
(c) Except as otherwise authorized under this section, a group or blanket policy shall not
impose any restrictions or delays on the coverage required under this section.
(d) Benefits for an enrollee under this section shall be the same for an enrollee's covered
spouse or domestic partner and covered non-spouse dependents.
(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, any health maintenance
corporation may issue to a religious employer an individual or group health insurance contract,
plan, or policy that excludes coverage for prescription contraceptive methods that are contrary to
the religious employer's bona fide religious tenets. The exclusion from coverage under this
subsection shall not apply to contraceptive services or procedures provided for purposes other than
contraception, such as decreasing the risk of ovarian cancer or eliminating symptoms of
menopause.
LC002275 - Page 12 of 15

(f) As used in this section, "religious employer" means an employer that is a "church or a
qualified church-controlled organization" as defined in 26 U.S.C. § 3121.
(g) Every religious employer that invokes the exemption provided under this section shall
provide written notice to prospective enrollees prior to enrollment with the plan, listing the
contraceptive healthcare services the employer refuses to cover for religious reasons.
(h) Beginning on the first day of each plan year after April 1, 2024, every health insurance
issuer offering group or individual health insurance coverage that covers prescription contraception
shall not restrict reimbursement for dispensing a covered prescription contraceptive up to three
hundred sixty-five (365) days at a time that may be furnished or dispensed all at once or over the
course of the twelve (12) month period at the discretion of the prescriber.
(i) Nothing in this section shall be construed to exclude coverage for contraceptive drugs,
devices, or products for reasons other than contraceptive purposes, such as decreasing the risk of
ovarian cancer or eliminating symptoms of menopause, or for contraception that is necessary to
preserve the life or health of an enrollee. A plan that violates this section is subject to penalties, in
accordance with § 40-8-9. The department may base its determinations on findings from onsite
surveys, enrollee or other complaints, financial status, or any other source.
(j) The department shall monitor plan compliance in accordance with this section and shall
adopt and regulations rules for the implementation of this section, including the following:
(1) In addition to any requirements under state administrative procedures, the department
shall engage in a stakeholder process prior to the adoption of rules and regulations that include
healthcare service plans, pharmacy benefit plans, consumer representatives, including those
representing youth, low-income people, and communities of color, and other interested parties. The
department shall hold stakeholder meetings for stakeholders of different types to ensure sufficient
opportunity to consider factors and processes relevant to contraceptive coverage. The department
shall provide notice of stakeholder meetings on the department's website, and stakeholder meetings
shall be open to the public.
(2) The department shall conduct random reviews of each plan and its subcontractors to
ensure compliance with this section.
(3) The department shall submit an annual report to the general assembly and any other
appropriate entity with its findings from the random compliance reviews detailed in this section
and any other compliance or implementation efforts. This report shall be made available to the
public on the department’s website.
LC002275 - Page 13 of 15

SECTION 6. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002275
========
LC002275 - Page 14 of 15